Tennessee, session 114, SB1324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-8-117, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting:
(c) Upon the request of the education committee of the senate or the committee
of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over subject matters pertaining to
education, the board of regents, a state university board, or the board of trustees of the
University of Tennessee shall provide a report to the requesting committee summarizing
grievance activities of the previous year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1324
003357
- 1 -